Hawaii statutes.
§706-670 Parole procedure; release on
parole; terms of parole, recommitment, and reparole; final unconditional
release. (1) [Repeal and reenactment on July 1, 2018. L 2012, c 139,
§14(4); L 2013, c 67, §2(4).] Parole hearing. A person sentenced
to an indeterminate term of imprisonment shall receive an initial parole
hearing at least one month before the expiration of the minimum term of
imprisonment determined by the Hawaii paroling authority pursuant to section
706-669. If the person has been sentenced to multiple terms of imprisonment,
the parole hearing shall not be required until at least one month before the
expiration of the minimum term that expires last in time. A validated risk
assessment shall be used to determine the person's risk of re-offense and
suitability for community supervision. For purposes of this subsection, "validated
risk assessment" means an actuarial tool to determine a person's
likelihood of engaging in future criminal behavior. The department of public
safety shall select a research-based risk assessment tool and shall validate
the accuracy of the risk assessment tool at least every five years in
consultation with the paroling authority. Assessments shall be performed by
department of public safety staff who are trained in the use of the risk
assessment tool. Except for good cause shown to the paroling authority, a
person who is assessed as low risk for re-offending shall be granted parole
upon completing the minimum sentence, unless the person:

(a) Is found to have an extensive criminal history
record that is indicative of a likelihood of future criminal behavior in spite
of the finding by the risk assessment by the paroling authority;

(b) Is found to have committed misconduct while in
prison that is equivalent to a misdemeanor or felony crime within thirty-six
months of the expiration of the minimum term of imprisonment;

(c) Has any pending felony charges in the State;

(d) Is incarcerated for a sexual offense under part
V of chapter 707 or child abuse under part VI of chapter 707; or

(e) Does not have a parole plan as set forth under
section 706-670(3) and (4), as approved by, and at the discretion of, the
paroling authority.

If parole is not granted at the initial parole
hearing, additional hearings shall be held at twelve-month intervals or less
until parole is granted or the maximum period of imprisonment expires. The
State shall have the right to be represented at the initial parole hearing and
all subsequent parole hearings by the prosecuting attorney, who may present
written testimony and make oral comments. The authority shall consider the
testimony and comments in reaching its decision. The authority shall notify
the appropriate prosecuting attorney of the hearing at the time the prisoner is
given notice of the hearing.

(2) Parole conditions. The authority, as a
condition of parole, may impose reasonable conditions on the prisoner as
provided under section 706-624.

(3) Prisoner's plan and participation. Each
prisoner shall be given reasonable notice of the prisoner's parole hearing and
shall prepare a parole plan, setting forth the manner of life the prisoner
intends to lead if released on parole, including specific information as to
where and with whom the prisoner will reside, a phone contact where the
prisoner can be reached, and what occupation or employment the prisoner will
follow, if any. The prisoner shall be paroled in the county where the prisoner
had a permanent residence or occupation or employment prior to the prisoner's
incarceration, unless the prisoner will: reside in a county in which the
population exceeds eight-hundred thousand persons; reside in a county in the
State in which the committed person has the greatest family or community
support, opportunities for employment, job training, education, treatment, and
other social services, as determined by the Hawaii paroling authority; or be
released for immediate departure from the State. The institutional parole
staff shall render reasonable aid to the prisoner in the preparation of the prisoner's
plan and in securing information for submission to the authority. In addition,
the prisoner shall:

(a) Be permitted to consult with any persons whose
assistance the prisoner reasonably desires, including the prisoner's own legal
counsel, in preparing for a hearing before the authority;

(b) Be permitted to be represented and assisted by
counsel at the hearing;

(c) Have counsel appointed to represent and assist
the prisoner if the prisoner so requests and cannot afford to retain counsel;
and

(d) Be informed of the prisoner's rights as set
forth in this subsection.

(4) Authority's decision; initial minimum term
of parole. The authority shall render its decision regarding a prisoner's
release on parole within a reasonable time after the parole hearing. A grant
of parole shall not be subject to acceptance by the prisoner. If the authority
denies parole after the hearing, it shall state its reasons in writing. A
verbatim stenographic or mechanical record of the parole hearing shall be made
and preserved in transcribed or untranscribed form. The authority, in its
discretion, may order a reconsideration or rehearing of the case at any time
and shall provide reasonable notice of the reconsideration or rehearing to the
prosecuting attorney. If parole is granted by the authority, the authority
shall set the initial minimum length of the parole term.

(5) Release upon expiration of maximum term.
If the authority fixes no earlier release date, a prisoner's release shall
become mandatory at the expiration of the prisoner's maximum term of
imprisonment.

(6) Sentence of imprisonment includes separate
parole term. A sentence to an indeterminate term of imprisonment under this
chapter includes as a separate portion of the sentence a term of parole or of
recommitment for violation of the conditions of parole.

(7) Revocation hearing. When a parolee has
been recommitted, the authority shall hold a hearing within sixty days after
the parolee's return to determine whether parole should be revoked. The parolee
shall have reasonable notice of the grounds alleged for revocation of the
parolee's parole. The institutional parole staff shall render reasonable aid
to the parolee in preparation for the hearing. In addition, the parolee shall
have, with respect to the revocation hearing, those rights set forth in
subsection (3)(a), (3)(b), (3)(c), and (3)(d). A record of the hearing shall
be made and preserved as provided in subsection (4).

(8) Length of recommitment and reparole after
revocation of parole. If a parolee's parole is revoked, the term of further
imprisonment upon such recommitment and of any subsequent reparole or
recommitment under the same sentence shall be fixed by the authority but shall
not exceed in aggregate length the unserved balance of the maximum term of
imprisonment.

(9) Final unconditional release. When the
prisoner's maximum parole term has expired or the prisoner has been sooner
discharged from parole, a prisoner shall be deemed to have served the
prisoner's sentence and shall be released unconditionally. [L 1972, c 9, pt of
§1; am L 1976, c 92, §8; am L 1983, c 30, §1; am L 1984, c 257, §3; am L 1986,
c 314, §47; am L 1988, c 282, §2; am L 1993, c 101, §2 and c 201, §2; gen ch
1993; am L 1996, c 193, §2; am L Sp 2007, c 8, §15; am L 2012, c 139, §§8, 12]

Note

The repeal and reenactment note at subsection (1) in the main
volume is amended to read as follows: "[Repeal and reenactment on July 1,
2018. L 2012, c 139, §14(4); L 2013, c 67, §2(4); L 2016, c 231, §69.]".

The L 2012, c 139, §8 amendment applies to individuals
committing an offense on or after July 1, 2012. L 2012, c 139, §14(3).

Cross References

Comprehensive offender reentry system, see chapter 353H.

COMMENTARY ON §706-670

Subsections (1) through (3) are largely self-explanatory and
adopt a procedure for parole determination which affords the prisoner an
opportunity to participate and be heard. The procedure also provides for
periodic review of the prisoner's case.

In the Proposed Draft, §670 provided for an automatic period
of parole, the length of which would vary with the prisoner's initial period of
incarceration, but which would not be greater than ten years, and which would
be required in every case following an indeterminate term of imprisonment. The
legislature did not accept this proposal in its entirety. Thus, subsection (4)
now requires a prisoner's unconditional release at the expiration of the
prisoner's maximum term of imprisonment. The legislature felt that to impose "an
additional term of parole would be an unfair burden to a person who has paid
his debt to society." Conference Committee Report No. 2 (1972).

Subsection (5) provides that the maximum term of parole shall
be ten years. In this area, as in terms of imprisonment, the Code leaves with
the Board of Paroles and Pardons the task of determining the minimum term of
parole.

Subsection (6) provides for a hearing on revocation of parole
which affords the parolee fair notice, representation, and assistance, much in
the same manner as that provided in the case of hearings on the minimum term
and initial parole.

Subsection (8) provides for unconditional discharge of the
defendant when the maximum term of parole has expired or upon sooner release by
the Board.

SUPPLEMENTAL COMMENTARY ON §706-670

Act 30, Session Laws 1983, amended subsection (1) to change
the maximum term of recommittal for a parole violator from ten years to the
remainder of the parolee's original, maximum sentence. It was felt that a
parole violator should not be relieved of any part of the court-imposed maximum
sentence. However, the legislature intended that the paroling authority
periodically reconsider the parole of any recommitted parolee. Senate Standing
Committee Report No. 357 (1983), House Standing Committee Report No. 811.

Act 257, Session Laws 1984, added a new subsection (2) to
allow the paroling authority, as a condition of parole, to prohibit a parolee
from entering certain geographical areas without the paroling authority's
permission.

Act 282, Session Laws 1988, amended this section to allow the
prosecuting attorney to appear and present oral comment and written testimony
at parole hearings before the Hawaii paroling authority, disallowing oral
testimony by witnesses. Senate Conference Committee Report No. 270, House
Conference Committee Report No. 96-88.

Act 101, Session Laws 1993, amended subsection (4) to clarify
that a grant of parole is not subject to the acceptance of the person being
paroled. Inmates who refuse parole and choose to remain in prison take up
valuable bedspace in already crowded correctional facilities, and the State
loses the opportunity to assist in reintegrating them back into the community.
House Standing Committee Report No. 1123, Senate Standing Committee Report No.
839.

Act 201, Session Laws 1993, amended subsection (3) to provide
that prisoners who have been granted parole are to be paroled in the county
where the prisoner had a permanent residence or occupation or employment prior
to incarceration, unless the prisoner will reside in a county having a
population exceeding 800,000 persons, or will be released for immediate
departure from the State. The legislature found that this would prevent an
influx of parolees whose roots are on Oahu from settling on the neighbor
islands, which could strain a county's social service infrastructure.
Conference Committee Report No. 104.

Act 193, Session Laws 1996, amended this section by providing
that the prosecuting attorney shall have the right to be represented at the
initial parole hearing and all subsequent parole hearings, and that the
prosecuting attorney shall have reasonable notice of the reconsideration or
rehearing of parole cases by the Hawaii paroling authority. The Act made clear
the prosecuting attorney's right to be represented and to receive notice, since
the current law was unclear regarding the prosecuting attorney's rights on
these matters. Conference Committee Report No. 60.

Act 8, Special Session Laws 2007, amended subsection (3) to
permit the Hawaii paroling authority to parole committed persons to the county
in the State where the committed person has the greatest family or community
support, opportunities for employment, job training, education, treatment, and
other social services. This will allow the Hawaii paroling authority to
provide meaningful opportunities for offenders to reintegrate into society and
demonstrate that they have the potential to function as law-abiding citizens.
Senate Standing Committee Report No. 993.

Act 139, Session Laws 2012, amended this section,
among other things, by: (1) requiring the department of public safety to
select a research-based risk assessment tool and validate the accuracy of the
risk assessment tool at least every five years in consultation with the Hawaii
paroling authority; (2) specifying that parole shall be granted upon completion
of the minimum term to a person who is assessed as low risk for reoffending
unless the person, among other things, is found to have: (A) committed
misconduct while in prison that is equivalent to a misdemeanor or felony crime
within thirty-six months of the expiration of the minimum term of imprisonment;
or (B) an extensive criminal history record that is indicative of a likelihood
of future criminal behavior in spite of the finding by the risk assessment; and
(3) requiring prisoners, in preparing their parole plan, to include, among
other things, a phone contact, if any, where they can be reached. The purpose
of Act 139 was to implement the recommendations of the justice reinvestment
working group. Act 139 was a recommendation of the Council of State
Governments Justice Center, which provided intensive technical assistance to
Hawaii to conduct a comprehensive analysis of the State's criminal justice
system and to help state leaders develop policy options that could increase
public safety while saving taxpayer dollars. The Justice Center utilized
a data-driven approach to identify inefficiencies, develop cost-effective
policy options, and develop a plan for a reinvestment of savings that reduces
recidivism and increases public safety. It was the legislature's intent to
realize cost savings and reinvest those savings back into the corrections
system to reduce recidivism, decrease the prison population, and strengthen public
safety. Conference Committee Report No. 165-12.

Act 139, Session Laws 2012, also provided for the reenactment
of subsection (1) upon the repeal of the amendments made by the Act on July 1,
2018.

Act 67, Session Laws 2013, made a technical amendment to the
repeal and reenactment provision of Act 139, Session Laws 2012, which affected
this section.

Act 231, Session Laws 2016, amended the repeal and
reenactment provision of Act 139, Session Laws 2012.

Case Notes

Neither this chapter nor chapter 353 prohibits the Hawaii
paroling authority from setting a prisoner's minimum term at a period equal to
his or her maximum sentence. 97 H. 183, 35 P.3d 210 (2001).

As §353-66 and this section can be given effect without
conflict, subsection (7) is not the "exclusive" law governing parole
revocations, does not embrace the entire law on the subject, and does not
repeal §353-66 by implication. 88 H. 229 (App.), 965 P.2d 162 (1998).

A petitioner is not entitled to relief for Hawaii paroling
authority's failure to comply with time limit specified in subsection (7) for
parole revocation hearing unless record shows that failure to comply (1) was
unreasonable and (2) caused petitioner actual prejudice. State's failure to
comply with specified time limit is presumptively unreasonable and it is Hawaii
paroling authority's burden to rebut this presumption; it is petitioner's
burden to prove that State's unreasonable failure to comply caused actual
prejudice to petitioner. 89 H. 474 (App.), 974 P.2d 1064 (1998).

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next